src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_NEG_COLL
+Coll:нан PRON_NEG_COLL_PERS ;
+Coll: PRON_NEG_COLL_PERS ; !+ZeroColl
!
+Coll+Acc+PxPl2:ныдтӧ K ; !+ZeroColl
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Coll+Acc+PxPl2:ныдтэ K ; !+ZeroColl
+Coll+Acc+PxPl2:наннытӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Coll+Acc+PxPl2:наннытэ K ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_COLL_PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON_NEG_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нум PRON_NEG_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON_NEG_COLL_CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON_NEG_COLL_CASES ;
!
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxPl2:нытэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxPl3:ныссэ K ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_COLL_CASES
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 PRON_NEG_OBL ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_OBL
! 2011-11-15 This is used by PRON_NEG
! also тэа-мэа inclusive 1Du, сыа-мэа exclusive 1Du
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !CHECKME 2019-10-27 is this distinct from Sg Nom
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
 ABL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 DAT/MORPH_THEN_K ;
+Acc:%>ӧс WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc:%>эс WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc+PxSg3:сэ WordEnd ;
 INS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 COM/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CAR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 CNS/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 PRON_NEG_SPAT ;

LEXICON PRON_NEG_SPAT
 INE/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ELA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 ILL/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 APR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 EGR/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TRA/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 TER/MORPH_THEN_K ;
 
LEXICON PRON_NEG_IS_ILL
+Neg+Ill: K ;

!! Tagged in the src/morphology/stems/pronouns.xml file
LEXICON PRON_
: K ;
LEXICON PronInterr
+Interr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON PronIndef
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Indef: WordEnd ;

!! Word-final cases

LEXICON ACC_WORD_END
+Acc:%>ӧс WordEnd ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Acc:%>эс WordEnd ;

LEXICON INDEF_IN_SJURO
+Der/sjurw:сюрӧ K ;
+Der/sjurw+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Err/Dial:сюре K ;

LEXICON INDEF_IN_KO
+Der/kw:кӧ K ;
+Der/kw+Err/Dial:ке K ;

LEXICON ABL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Abl:лысь WordEnd ; !

LEXICON ACC_PXSG1/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxSg1:%>ӧс WordEnd ; !
+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Dial:%>эс WordEnd ; !

LEXICON ACC_PXSG2/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxSg2:%>тӧ WordEnd ; !
+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Dial:%>тэ WordEnd ; !

LEXICON ACC_PXSG3/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxSg3:%>сӧ WordEnd ; !
+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Dial:%>сэ WordEnd ; !

LEXICON ACC_PXPL1/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нымес WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумес WordEnd ;

LEXICON ACC_PXPL2/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxPl2:ныдтӧ WordEnd ; ! OKK:61
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Dial:нытӧ WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Dial:ныдтэ WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Dial:нытэ WordEnd ;

LEXICON ACC_PXPL3/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Acc+PxPl3:нысӧ WordEnd ; ! OKK:61
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Dial:нысэ WordEnd ; !
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныссӧ WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныссэ WordEnd ;

LEXICON APR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Apr:лань WordEnd ;

LEXICON CAR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Car:тӧг WordEnd ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тэг WordEnd ;

LEXICON CMPR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Cmpr:ся WordEnd ;

LEXICON CNS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;

LEXICON COM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Com:%>кӧд WordEnd ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед WordEnd ;

LEXICON DAT/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Dat:лы WordEnd ; !

LEXICON EGR/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;

LEXICON ELA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Ela:ысь WordEnd ; 

LEXICON GEN/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Gen:%>лӧн WordEnd ; !
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн WordEnd ; !

LEXICON ILL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Ill:%>ӧ WordEnd ; !
+Ill+Err/Dial:%>э WordEnd ; !

LEXICON INE/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;

LEXICON INS/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн WordEnd ;
+Ins:%>ӧн WordEnd ;

LEXICON NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Nom+Comp:%>джык WordEnd ; ! for nouns and pronouns 2021-01-07

LEXICON PRL/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Prl:%>ӧд WordEnd ;
+Prl+Err/Dial:%>эд WordEnd ;

LEXICON TER/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Ter:%>ӧдз WordEnd ;
+Ter+Err/Dial:%>эдз WordEnd ;

LEXICON TRA/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND
+Tra:ті WordEnd ;

LEXICON ABL/MORPH_THEN_K
+Abl:лысь K ; !
LEXICON ABL_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Abl+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлысь K ;
+Abl+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>лысь K ;

LEXICON APR/MORPH_THEN_K
+Apr:лань K ;
LEXICON APR_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Apr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлань K ;
+Apr+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>лань K ;

LEXICON CAR/MORPH_THEN_K
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тэг K ;
LEXICON CAR_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Car+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйтӧг K ;
+Car+PxSg1+So/PC:%>этэг K ;

LEXICON CAR_PXSG2_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Car+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ыдтӧг K ;
+Car+PxSg2+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>ыдтэг K ;

LEXICON CMPR/MORPH_THEN_K
+Cmpr:ся K ;
LEXICON CMPR_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйся K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>ся K ;

LEXICON CNS/MORPH_THEN_K
+Cns:ла K ;

LEXICON CNS_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Cns+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйла K ;
+Cns+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>ла K ;

LEXICON COM/MORPH_THEN_K
+Com:%>кӧд K ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед K ;

LEXICON COM_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Com+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧй%>кӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>кед K ;

LEXICON DAT/MORPH_THEN_K
+Dat:лы K ; !
LEXICON DAT_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлы K ;
+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>элы K ;

LEXICON EGR/MORPH_THEN_K
+Egr:сянь K ;

LEXICON EGR_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Egr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйсянь K ;
+Egr+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>сянь K ;

LEXICON ELA/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ela:ысь K ; 

LEXICON GEN/MORPH_THEN_K
+Gen:%>лӧн K ; !
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн K ; !

LEXICON GEN_PXSG1_SOPC/MORPH_THEN_K
+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC+Err/Dial:%>э%>лэн K ;

LEXICON ILL/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ill:%>ӧ K ; !
+Ill+Err/Dial:%>э K ; !

LEXICON INE/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ine:ын K ;

LEXICON INS/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн K ;
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;

LEXICON NOM/MORPH_THEN_K
+Nom: K ;
LEXICON NOM_PXSG1/MORPH_THEN_K
+Nom+PxSg1:%>ӧй K ;
+Nom+PxSg1+Err/Dial:%>э K ;

LEXICON PRL/MORPH_THEN_K
+Prl:%>ӧд K ;
+Prl+Err/Dial:%>эд K ;

LEXICON PRL_PXSG1_SOCP/MORPH_THEN_K
+Prl+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӧдым K ;
+Prl+PxSg1+So/CP+Err/Dial:%>эдым K ;

LEXICON TER/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ter:%>ӧдз K ;
+Ter+Err/Dial:%>эдз K ;

LEXICON TER_PXSG1_SOCP/MORPH_THEN_K
+Ter+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӧдзым K ;
+Ter+PxSg1+So/CP+Err/Dial:%>эдзым K ;

LEXICON TRA/MORPH_THEN_K
+Tra:ті K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
